Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.835

County auditor to publish voter challenges on the internet—Ongoing notification requirements—Retention.

(1) The county auditor shall, within seventy-two hours of receipt, publish on the auditor's internet website the entire content of any voter challenge filed under chapter 29A.08 RCW. Immediately after publishing any voter challenge, the county auditor shall notify any person who requests to receive such notifications on an ongoing basis.

(2) The information on the website may be removed 45 days following certification of an election. Information related to the challenge must be maintained by the county auditor for the appropriate retention period, and is subject to disclosure upon request.

[ 2023 c 466 s 30; 2006 c 320 s 1.]